Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 4 Mental Health, Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention and/or Treatment, Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities, and Personal Support Services Licensure Law
33-2-407. Suspension or revocation of license — Civil penalties.

The department may suspend or revoke a license on the following grounds:

A violation of this title or rules adopted under this title;

Permitting, aiding or abetting the commission of any illegal act during a licensed service or in a licensed facility;

Conduct or practice found by the department to be detrimental to the welfare of the service recipients of a licensed service or facility; or

Abuse, misappropriation of property or neglect.

The department may impose a civil penalty on a licensee for a violation of this title or a department rule. Each day of a violation constitutes a separate violation. The department shall establish by rule a schedule designating the minimum and maximum civil penalties within the ranges set in § 33-2-409 that may be assessed under this part for violation of each statute and rule that is subject to violation. The department may exclude a statute or rule from the schedule if it determines that a civil penalty for violation of that statute or rule would not achieve the purposes of licensure. If the department has not adopted a rule designating the minimum and maximum civil penalty that may be assessed for violation of a statute or rule, the maximum civil penalty that may be imposed for violation of that statute or rule shall be the lowest figure set under the appropriate subsection of § 33-2-409 that applies to the violation.

The procedure governing the suspension or revocation of a license or imposition of a civil penalty shall be as prescribed in this subsection (c).

A complaint shall be filed by the department stating facts constituting a ground or grounds for the proposed action.

If the department determines that a license should be suspended or revoked, a civil penalty imposed, or both, it shall so notify the licensee. Within fifteen (15) days of notification, the licensee may file a written request for review by the panel appointed under § 33-2-403(d). The review shall be at the earliest possible date, and the panel shall report its recommendations to the commissioner. The commissioner shall determine whether the original action shall remain effective and shall notify the licensee. Within fifteen (15) days of notification, the licensee may file a written request for a hearing before the department. The hearing shall be conducted under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The department may determine after the hearing that the license be suspended or revoked, that a civil penalty be imposed, or that no action be taken.

If the department determines that a license should be suspended, the department may also set the conditions to be met by the licensee during the period of suspension to entitle the licensee to resume operation of the service or facility.

If the department determines that a license should be suspended or revoked, a civil penalty should be imposed, or both, the department shall enter an order stating the grounds for the action.

The department may, after a hearing, hold a case under consideration and specify requirements to be met by a licensee to avoid either suspension, revocation, or civil penalty. In those cases, the department shall enter an order accordingly and notify the licensee by certified mail. If the licensee complies with the order and proves that fact to the satisfaction of the department, the department shall enter an order showing satisfactory compliance and dismiss the case because of compliance.

If a civil penalty lawfully imposed under this part is not paid, the penalty shall be recoverable in the name of the state by the attorney general and reporter in the chancery court of Davidson County or by legal counsel for the department in the chancery court of the county in which all or part of the violation occurred.

Acts 1978, ch. 853, § 7; 1981, ch. 436, § 4; T.C.A., § 33-1807; Acts 1989, ch. 559, § 3; T.C.A., § 33-2-507; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2003, ch. 103, § 2.

Cross-References. Suspension or revocation of license for abuse in operation of facility, § 33-2-415.

33-2-408. Sanctions against licensed entities.

All proceedings by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities (DIDD) to impose sanctions against licensed entities under this title shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The proceedings shall include notice and opportunity for a hearing before an administrative law judge who shall issue an initial order.

Sanctions shall include any action by DIDD, based upon alleged deficient practices of the licensed entity, to impose financial or contractual penalties, including the following:

Financial penalties shall include fines, liquidated damages or denial, withholding or delay of a payment;

Imposition of moratoria on admissions when the limitations are unrelated to state budget considerations; or

Actions against the entity based upon allegations that the entity is responsible for abuse, neglect, exploitation, misappropriation or mistreatment of an individual for whom the entity is responsible.

Sanctions do not include any action to recoup moneys that are determined by DIDD to be unearned, according to stipulations specified in the provider agreement between DIDD and the provider.

This section shall not prevent termination of any contract with the licensed entity in accordance with the provisions of that contract. In those cases the contractor shall have only the due process rights, if any, otherwise provided by law regarding termination of state contracts.

All sanctions, except for financial sanctions, may be imposed immediately by DIDD. This does not prevent the provider from appealing the decision using the process as provided in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

These requirements shall not prevent the DIDD or the provider from pursuing alternative means of resolving issues related to sanctions while the process as provided in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act is pending.

Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1; 2009, ch. 477, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 32; 2011, ch. 158, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-408, concerning amount of civil penalties, was transferred to § 33-2-409 by Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

33-2-409. Amount of civil penalties.

A civil penalty of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500) may be imposed on a licensee for a violation of a statute or rule.

A civil penalty of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) may be imposed on a licensee for a second or subsequent violation of the same kind committed within twelve (12) months of the first penalty being imposed.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-2-408; Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-409, concerning the service recipient protection trust fund, was transferred to § 33-2-410 by Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

33-2-410. Service recipient protection trust fund.

The commissioner shall establish and maintain a service recipient protection trust fund, created by the deposit of all civil penalty moneys collected under this part.

The trust fund shall be maintained for the purpose of protecting the service recipients of a facility or service, whose noncompliance with the conditions of continued licensure, applicable state and federal statutes, rules, or contractual standards threatens the service recipients' care or property or the facility's or service's continued operation.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, trust funds remaining unspent at the end of the fiscal year shall be carried over into the budget of the department for the subsequent fiscal year, and shall continue to be carried over from year to year until expended for the purposes prescribed in this section.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-2-409; Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-410, concerning surveyor notification to licensee of violations, was transferred to § 33-2-411 by Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

33-2-411. Surveyor to notify licensee of violations.

If a licensure surveyor finds a violation of a statute or rule that may be a ground for a civil penalty, the surveyor shall advise the licensee of the finding orally before concluding the survey.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-2-410; Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1; 2004, ch. 565, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-411, concerning suit to enjoin services rendered without license or under suspended or revoked license, was transferred to § 33-2-412 by Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

33-2-412. Suit to enjoin services rendered without license or under suspended or revoked license.

A department may sue to enjoin any person, partnership, association or corporation from establishing, conducting, managing or operating any service or facility providing mental health, alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment, intellectual or developmental disability services, or personal support services within the meaning of this part without having obtained a license or while its license has been suspended or revoked. Suit may be brought in the name of the state by the attorney general and reporter in the chancery court of Davidson County or by legal counsel for a department in the chancery court of the county in which all or part of the violations occurred.

In charging any defendant in a complaint for injunction, it shall be sufficient to charge that the defendant did, upon a certain day and in a certain county, establish, conduct, manage or operate a service or facility providing mental health, alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment, intellectual or developmental disability services, or personal support services or that the defendant is about to do so without having a license, without averring any further or more particular facts concerning the case.

Acts 1978, ch. 853, § 8; 1981, ch. 436, § 5; T.C.A., § 33-1808; Acts 1988, ch. 828, § 8; 1993, ch. 234, § 26; T.C.A., § 33-2-508; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-2-411; Acts 2001, ch. 282, § 6; 2001, ch. 299, § 1; 2012, ch. 1010, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-412, concerning inspections of facilities, was transferred to § 33-2-413 by Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

33-2-413. Inspections of facilities.

The department shall make at least one (1) unannounced life safety and environmental inspection of each licensed service or facility yearly. The department shall inspect for quality standards all licensees that contract with the department as part of its contract monitoring. The department shall inspect for quality standards all licensees that do not contract with the department. The department may deem a service or facility in compliance without inspection if the service or facility meets another government agency's certification or accreditation requirements provided for in rules of the department.

With or without giving notice, the department may enter the premises and inspect any applicant or licensee when a complaint is filed with the department against the applicant or licensee or when the department otherwise deems inspection in the interest of service recipients. Inspection may include review of physical plant, program, activities, and applicant or licensee records.

The department may charge a fee for any service or facility inspection in an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00).

If the department finds noncompliance with life safety or food service standards relating to non-life threatening issues, the department shall refer the findings to the state or local agency responsible for life safety or food service inspection for re-inspection or review in accordance with life safety or food service standards. The department will accept the state or local agency's determination.

The department shall, to the extent practicable, coordinate life safety inspections to avoid duplication without good cause in the same calendar year by other government agencies that apply substantially the same standards.

The department shall include in its annual inspection of each hospital licensed under this title a determination of the hospital's compliance with the reporting requirements of § 33-3-117. The hospital must document its compliance with a record of its communication with local law enforcement with respect to the commitments. A hospital's failure to comply with the reporting requirements shall subject the hospital to civil penalties or other action against the hospital's license under § 33-2-407.

Acts 1978, ch. 853, § 9; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 28, 29; T.C.A., § 33-1809; Acts 1989, ch. 559, § 4; T.C.A., § 33-2-509; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-2-412; Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1; 2018, ch. 1015, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-413, concerning departmental assistance to applicants and to service recipients affected by license denial, suspension or revocation, was transferred to § 33-2-414 by Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1015, § 4. July 1, 2018.

33-2-414. Departmental assistance to applicants and to service recipients affected by license denial, suspension or revocation.

The department may provide assistance to applicants for a license under this part. The department shall provide assistance in placing service recipients who are adversely affected by denial, suspension, or revocation of a license under this part.

Acts 1978, ch. 853, § 11; T.C.A., §§ 33-1810; 33-2-510; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-2-413; Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-414, concerning provisional licenses, was transferred to § 33-2-415 by Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

33-2-415. Provisional licenses.

The department may grant a provisional license for up to one (1) year to a service or facility if:

The service or facility is making a diligent effort to comply with standards adopted under this part;

The continued operation of the service or facility will not endanger the health or safety of its service recipients;

The continued operation of the service or facility is necessary because care is not otherwise reasonably available for its service recipients;

The service or facility has submitted an acceptable compliance plan specifying how and when deficiencies will be corrected; and

The service or facility has substantially met the commitments made in the preceding year's compliance plan, if any.

Failure to meet the commitments made in the compliance plan is a ground for revocation or suspension of the license.

Copies of provisional licenses and compliance plans shall be maintained in a central location and are open to public inspection.

Acts 1978, ch. 853, § 12; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1983, ch. 323, § 30; T.C.A., §§ 33-1811, 33-2-511; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-2-414; Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-415, concerning requirement that department investigate reports of abuse, dereliction or deficiency in operation of facility, private cause of action, and departmental remedies, was transferred to § 33-2-416 by Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

33-2-416. Department to investigate reports of abuse, dereliction or deficiency in operation of facility — Private cause of action — Departmental remedies.

The department shall investigate reports of serious abuse, dereliction or deficiency in the operation of a licensed service or facility.

A person making any report or investigation pursuant to this part, including representatives of the department in the reasonable performance of their duties and within the scope of their authority, shall be presumed to be acting in good faith and shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be incurred or imposed.

Any such person shall have the same immunity with respect to participation in any judicial proceeding resulting from the report or investigation.

Any person making a report under this part shall have a civil cause of action for appropriate compensatory and punitive damages against any person who causes a detrimental change in the employment status of the reporting party by reason of the report.

The commissioner shall suspend or revoke the license of any service or facility if serious abuse, dereliction or deficiency is found and not corrected in a reasonable time.

The commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, may suspend enrollment in a service or facility pending resolution of the investigation or of proceedings to suspend, revoke, or deny the license, or until the service or facility corrects any serious abuse, dereliction, or deficiency found in the course of the investigation. The commissioner may suspend enrollment in a licensed service or facility based on probable cause to believe that serious abuse, dereliction, or deficiency in the operation of the licensed service or facility has occurred or would occur without suspension of enrollment. Suspension of enrollment shall not exceed a period of one hundred twenty (120) days except that, in the discretion of the commissioner, the period may be extended for an additional period not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days. Nothing in this part takes away from the right of the department to issue an order of summary suspension of the license pursuant to § 4-5-320(c) and (d).

Acts 1978, ch. 853, § 13; 1983, ch. 323, § 31; T.C.A., § 33-1812; Acts 1987, ch. 248, § 2; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-2-512; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-2-415; Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-416, concerning the provision of services without license, actions by commissioner, and violations, was transferred to § 33-2-417 by Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

Cross-References. Suspension or revocation of license, § 33-2-407.

33-2-417. Provision of services without license — Actions by commissioner — Violations.

If a commissioner finds that a service or facility is providing mental health, alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment, intellectual or developmental disability services, or personal support services without a license, the commissioner may, without prior notice, order the service or facility immediately to cease and desist from providing mental health, alcohol and drug abuse prevention and/or treatment, intellectual or developmental disability services, or personal support services. Before issuing a cease and desist order, the commissioner shall find that entering the order is in the public interest; necessary for the protection of the health, safety, or welfare of the service recipients of the service or facility; and consistent with the purposes fairly intended by this part.

The order shall state the relevant findings of fact and conclusions of law that support the commissioner's finding that entering the order without prior notice is in the public interest, necessary for the protection of the service recipients of the service or facility, and consistent with this part. The order shall provide notice to the respondent of the respondent's rights and responsibilities concerning review of the order.

The owner of the service or facility ordered to cease and desist operation may seek review of the order before the commissioner or the commissioner's designee under this subsection (c).

The owner or legal representative of the service or facility may request an informal conference before the commissioner or the commissioner's designee. The request shall be filed with the commissioner within thirty (30) days of entry of the order. The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall convene the requested informal conference within seven (7) days of the date of receipt of the request. The conference is informal and the service or facility has the right to be represented by counsel at all stages of the informal conference.

The sole issue to be determined at the informal conference is whether the service or facility was operating without a license as required by this part prior to or concurrently with the date of the entry of the order. This part and its rules control this determination. At the conference the commissioner may uphold, amend, or rescind the cease and desist order. Unless contested under subdivision (c)(4), the original or amended cease and desist order becomes a final order within seven (7) days.

If the commissioner or the commissioner's designee determines, as a result of the informal conference, that the cease and desist order should be amended or should not be rescinded, the owner or legal representative of the service or facility may seek review of the order under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3. The request shall be made in writing to the commissioner within seven (7) days of receipt of written notice of the commissioner's decision. Upon receipt of the request, the commissioner shall immediately refer the matter to the department of state for initiation of contested case proceedings.

If the respondent fails to request an informal conference under subdivision (c)(1), then the cease and desist order becomes a final order of the commissioner within thirty (30) days of its entry. The service or facility may obtain judicial review of this final order in the chancery court of Davidson County under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

It is a Class B misdemeanor to violate a cease and desist order lawfully entered by the commissioner. Each day of operation in violation of the commissioner's cease and desist order, calculated from the date of its service upon the owner or operator of the service or facility, is a separate offense.

Nothing in this part precludes any person, including the department, who is aggrieved by the operation of an unlicensed service or facility from pursuing other remedies and sanctions, including those provided by §§ 33-2-405 and 33-2-412.

Acts 1996, ch. 796, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-2-513; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-2-416; Acts 2001, ch. 282, § 7; 2001, ch. 299, § 1; 2012, ch. 1010, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 33-2-417, concerning residential facilities, was transferred to § 33-2-418 by Acts 2001, ch. 299, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

33-2-418. Residential facilities.

Any residential facility that houses persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities and is required by law to be licensed by the department shall not receive a license if the facility houses more than four (4) persons served and is not licensed on June 23, 2000. The department shall not license more than two (2) such residential facilities within five hundred yards (500 yds.) in any direction from other such facilities housing persons served. All set-back requirements applicable to lots where such facilities are located shall apply to such residential facilities.

This section does not apply to:

Housing for persons with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance;

Housing for residents on property owned or leased by the state or a corporation that provides that housing if the property was recorded in the corporate or state name before January 1, 1989;

Housing for service recipients when the commissioner authorizes the transfer of a license at the same site to a successor provider, if, and only if, the license holder's contract with the department is terminated, the transfer of license is necessary to sustain the quality of life of the service recipients, and the successor provider does not increase the number of service recipients at the site; or

Housing for persons on a temporary or transitional basis, such as boarding facilities provided by residential schools or facilities providing services through a specialized court program addressing the needs of individuals both in court custody and dually diagnosed with an intellectual or developmental disability and mental illness.

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a residential facility or provider licensed by the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities to provide residential services to persons with intellectual or developmental disabilities shall not be prohibited from providing residential services to the elderly or adults with physical disabilities, so long as the services are adequate to ensure the health, safety and welfare of each resident.

Acts 1989, ch. 504, § 1; T.C.A., § 33-5-105; Acts 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; T.C.A. § 33-2-417; Acts 2002, ch. 730, § 4; 2009, ch. 426, § 1; 2012, ch. 1010, §§ 12-14.

Cross-References. Residences of retarded or handicapped persons, title 13, ch. 24, part 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Validity of restrictions on licensure of facilities housing persons with disabilities. OAG 14-85, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 91 (9/18/14).

House Bill 604/Senate Bill 567, 109th Gen. Assemb. (Tenn. 2015) [not passed], and House Bill 413/Senate Bill 583, 109th Gen. Assemb. (Tenn. 2015) [not passed] - Licensure Standards for Facilities Providing Services to Disabled Persons. OAG 15-15, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (3/2/2015).

33-2-419. Standardized training and continuing education required — Classifications.

Any individual employed by a personal support services agency to provide personal support services must complete standardized training and continuing education under department rules.

The department may create classifications for personal support services agencies specializing in a type of service or care and may require additional training and continuing education for those classifications.

Acts 2001, ch. 282, § 8.

33-2-420. Dual licensing not required.

If an agency is licensed as a personal support services agency under this title, it does not have to be licensed under title 68, chapter 11, part 2, as a home care organization to provide personal support services. If an agency is licensed under title 68, chapter 11, part 2, as a home care organization, it does not have to be licensed under this title to provide personal support services.

Acts 2001, ch. 282, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 299, effective May 29, 2001, added a new section designated as § 33-2-408 and renumbered existing §§ 33-2-408 through 33-2-417 as §§ 33-2-409 through 33-2-418. Accordingly, §§ 33-2-418 and 33-2-419 added by Acts 2001, ch. 282, have been renumbered as §§ 33-2-419 and 420.

33-2-421. Providers of personal support services.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Personal support services agency” means a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or a limited partnership that provides personal support services as defined in this part. “Personal support services agency” includes an entity that employs or subcontracts with individuals who provide personal support services to service recipients; and

“Personal support services worker” means a person licensed as a personal support services agency, or an employee or an individual subcontracted by a personal support services agency who is providing personal support services pursuant to an arrangement between a service recipient and a personal support services agency.

In addition to the standards and requirements for personal support services as established by rules adopted by the department, personal support services agencies shall comply with the requirements in this section.

A personal support services agency shall provide to each service recipient a consumer notice before beginning service, which shall include, at a minimum, the following:

The duties, responsibilities, obligations and legal liabilities of the personal support services agency, the personal support services worker, and the personal support services recipient. The description shall clearly set forth the service recipient’s responsibility, if any, for:

Day-to-day supervision of the personal support services workers;

Assigning duties to the personal support services worker;

Hiring, firing and discipline of the personal support services worker;

Provision of equipment or materials for use by the personal support services worker;

Performing a criminal background check on the personal support services worker;

Checking the personal support services worker's references; and

Ensuring credentials and appropriate licensure/certification of a personal support services worker; and

A statement identifying the personal support services agency as an employer, or contractor, as applicable, of the personal support services worker along with the responsibility the personal support services agency will assume for the payment of the personal support services worker's wages, including overtime pay for hours worked in excess of forty (40) hours in a workweek, taxes, social security, workers' compensation and unemployment compensation payments.

A personal support services agency shall provide a notice to each personal support services worker who is placed with a service recipient before the worker provides any service to the service recipient. The worker notice shall contain the following information:

The relationship between the personal support services agency and the personal support services workers; and

A description of the duties, responsibilities, obligations and legal liabilities of the personal support services agency, the service recipient, and the personal support services worker. That description shall include the following information:

A statement identifying the employing or contracting personal support services agency as responsible for the payment of the personal support services worker's wages, including overtime pay for hours worked in excess of forty (40) hours in a workweek, taxes, social security, unemployment and workers' compensation insurance as prescribed by state and federal law; and

A statement identifying which party will be responsible for the personal support services worker's hiring, firing, discipline, day-to-day supervision, assignment of duties and provision of equipment or materials for use by the personal support services worker.

The notices required under subsection (c) shall be signed by the service recipient or authorized representative and retained by the personal support services agency at its office for not less than two (2) years following termination of service.

Acts 2007, ch. 408, § 1.

33-2-422. Differentiation between licensed physicians based on maintenance of certification.

For purposes of this section:

“Maintenance of certification” means any process requiring periodic recertification examinations or other activities to maintain specialty medical board certification; and

“Organized medical staff” means an organized body composed of individuals appointed by a facility's governing board that operates under bylaws approved by the governing body and is responsible for the quality of medical care provided to patients by the facility.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, facilities licensed under this title may only differentiate between licensed physicians based on a physician's maintenance of certification in medical staff privileging and credentialing when authorized through the following process:

The voting members of the facility's organized medical staff vote to adopt the differentiation; and

The facility's governing body reviews and approves the action of the medical staff.

An authorization described by subsection (b) may:

Establish terms applicable to the facility's differentiation, including:

Appropriate grandfathering provisions; and

Limiting the differentiation to certain medical specialties; and

Be rescinded at any time when:

The voting members of the facility's organized medical staff vote to rescind the differentiating action; and

The facility's governing body reviews and approves the rescinding action of the organized medical staff.

Nothing in this section restricts a facility's ability to differentiate between physicians in medical staff privileging and credentialing based on a physician's maintenance of certification when:

The facility's designation under law or certification or accreditation by a national certifying or accrediting organization is contingent on the facility requiring a specific maintenance of certification by physicians seeking staff privileges or credentialing at the facility; and

The differentiation is limited to those physicians whose maintenance of certification is required for the facility's designation, certification, or accreditation as described by subdivision (d)(1).

Nothing in this section requires a facility's organized medical staff or governing body to reconsider or vote to reconsider maintenance of certification differentiation or requirements made prior to July 1, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 694, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 694 § 4. July 1, 2018.

33-2-423. Prohibited marketing practices.

The general assembly recognizes that consumers of substance abuse treatment have disabling conditions and that consumers and their families are vulnerable and at risk of being easily victimized by fraudulent marketing practices that adversely impact the delivery of health care. To protect the health, safety, and welfare of this vulnerable population, a service provider of alcohol and drug services or an operator of an alcohol and drug treatment facility (ADTF) shall not engage in any of the following marketing practices:

Making a materially false or misleading statement or providing materially false or misleading information about the provider's or operator's identity, products, goods, services, or geographical locations in its marketing, advertising materials, or media or on its website;

Including on its website false information or electronic links, coding, or activation that provides false information or that surreptitiously directs the reader to another website;

Soliciting, receiving, or making an attempt to solicit or receive a commission, benefit, rebate, kickback, or bribe, directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, or engaging or making an attempt to engage in a split-fee arrangement in return for a referral or an acceptance or acknowledgement of treatment from a service provider of alcohol and drug services or ADTF; or

Entering into a contract with a marketing provider who agrees to generate referrals or leads for the placement of patients with a service provider of alcohol and drug services or in an ADTF through a call center or a web-based presence. This subdivision (a)(4) shall not apply if the service provider of alcohol and drug services or the operator of the ADTF discloses to the prospective patient, so that the patient can make an informed healthcare decision, in clear and concise language and instructions that allow the prospective patient to easily determine whether the marketing provider represents specific service providers or recovery residences that pay a fee to the marketing provider, and the identity of such service providers of alcohol and drug services or ADTF.

In addition to any other punishment authorized by law, a person or entity that knowingly violates this section is subject to suspension or revocation of the person's or entity's license pursuant to § 33-2-407 and the imposition of civil penalties under § 33-2-409.

Acts 2018, ch. 855, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 855, § 4. July 1, 2018.